California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(e) It is the policy of the state that any net proceeds from the sale by a water corporation of real property that was at any time, but is no longer, necessary or useful in the provision of public utility service, shall be invested by a water corporation in infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties that are necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public and that all of that investment in infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties shall be included among the other utility property of the water corporation that is used and useful in providing water service and upon which the commission authorizes the water corporation the opportunity to earn a reasonable return.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

790.

(a) Whenever a water corporation sells any real property that was at any time, but is no longer, necessary or useful in the performance of the water corporation’s duties to the public, the water corporation shall invest the net proceeds, if any, including interest at the rate that the commission prescribes for memorandum accounts, from the sale in water system infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties that are necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public. For purposes of tracking the net proceeds and their investment, the water corporation shall maintain records necessary to document the investment of the net proceeds pursuant to this article. The amount of the net proceeds shall be a water corporation’s primary source of capital for investment in utility infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties that are necessary or useful in the performance of the water corporation’s duties in providing water utility service to the public.

(b) All water utility infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties constructed or acquired by, and used and useful to, a water corporation by investment pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be included among the water corporation’s other utility property upon which the commission authorizes the water corporation the opportunity to earn a reasonable return.

(c) This article shall apply to the investment of the net proceeds referred to in subdivision (a) for a period of 8 years from the end of the calendar year in which the water corporation receives the net proceeds. The balance of any net proceeds and interest thereon that is not invested after the eight-year period shall be allocated solely to ratepayers.

(d) Upon application by a water corporation with 10,000 or fewer service connections, the commission may, after a hearing, by rule or order, exempt the water corporation from the requirements of this article.

(e) The commission retains continuing authority to determine the used, useful, or necessary status of any and all infrastructure improvements and investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

790.1.

In any proceeding pending after January 1, 1996, the commission shall apply this article in its consideration of any matter concerning the sale by a water corporation of real property that is not necessary or useful in the provision of water utility service, for any sale that occurred prior to that date. If the water corporation has not invested the net proceeds therefrom in utility infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties that are necessary or useful in the provision of water service to the public, it may elect to do so during the period provided in subdivision (c) of Section 790 and that period shall be deemed to have commenced as of January 1, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Books and Accounts [791. - 799.]

791.

Each public utility shall have an office in a county of this State in which its property or some portion thereof is located and shall keep in that office all the books, accounts, papers, and records required by the commission to be kept within this State. No such books, accounts, papers, or records shall be at any time removed from the State except upon such conditions as the commission prescribes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

792.

The commission may establish a system of accounts to be kept by the public utilities subject to its jurisdiction, or classify such public utilities and establish a system of accounts for each class, and may prescribe the manner in which such accounts shall be kept. It may also prescribe the forms of accounts, records, and memoranda to be kept by such public utilities, including the accounts, records, and memoranda of the movement of traffic as well as the receipts and expenditures of moneys, and any other forms, records, and memoranda which in the judgment of the commission may be necessary to carry out any of the provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

792.5.

(a) Whenever the commission authorizes any change in rates reflecting and passing through to customers specific changes in costs, except rates set for common carriers, the commission shall require as a condition of the order that the public utility establish and maintain a balancing account reflecting the balance, whether positive or negative, between the related costs and revenues, and the commission shall take into account by appropriate adjustment or other action any positive or negative balance remaining in the balancing account at the time of any subsequent rate adjustment.

(b) The commission shall develop a risk-based approach for reviewing or auditing balancing accounts
 periodically to ensure that the transactions recorded in the balancing accounts are for allowable purposes and are supported by appropriate documentation.

(c) The commission shall maintain an inventory of the balancing accounts established pursuant to this section.

(d) The commission shall require the public utility to record all related costs and revenues in the balancing account, unless those costs or revenues are specifically exempted by the commission.

(e) The commission shall adopt balancing account review or audit procedures that are consistent with a risk-based approach.

(f) The commission may forgo the review or audit of a balancing account pursuant to this section if
 an independent auditor
 has reviewed or audited the balancing account in the preceding five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 28.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

793.

The system of accounts and the forms of accounts, records, and memoranda prescribed by the commission for corporations subject to the regulatory authority of the United States, shall not be inconsistent with the systems and forms from time to time established for such corporations by or under the authority of the United States. Nothing in this section or Section 794 shall affect the power of the commission to prescribe forms of accounts, records, and memoranda covering information in addition to that required by or under the authority of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 832.)
-------------------------------------------

794.

The commission may, after notice, and hearing if requested within 15 days after receipt of notice, prescribe by order the accounts in which particular outlays and receipts shall be entered, charged, or credited. Where the commission has prescribed the forms of accounts, records, or memoranda to be kept by any public utility for any of its business, it is unlawful for such public utility to keep any accounts, records, or memoranda for such business other than those so prescribed, or those prescribed by or under the authority of any other state or of the United States, except such accounts, records, or memoranda as are explanatory of and supplemental to those prescribed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 832.)
-------------------------------------------

795.

The commission may, after hearing if requested, require any or all public utilities to carry a proper and adequate depreciation account in the form and in accordance with such rules as the commission prescribes. The commission may, from time to time, ascertain and by order fix the proper and adequate rates of depreciation of the several classes of property of each public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

796.

(a) The commission shall disallow, for purposes of setting the rates to be charged by any electrical, gas, or heat corporation for the services or commodities furnished by it, all expenses for advertising which encourage increased consumption of such services or commodities.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may allow, for purposes of setting rates, expenses for advertising which encourages the more efficient operation of the electric, gas, or heating plant, or for advertising which encourages the more efficient use of electricity, gas, or heat or the conservation of energy or natural resources, or presents accurate information on the economical purchase, maintenance, or effective use of electrical or gas appliances and devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 194.)
-------------------------------------------

797.

The commission shall periodically audit, or direct that an independent audit be periodically conducted for, all significant transactions, as specified by the commission, between a water corporation with more than 2,000 service connections, or an electrical, gas, or telephone corporation, and every subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, that water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation. The commission, in this connection, may utilize the services of an independent auditor, who shall be selected and supervised by the commission, or may direct a water corporation with more than 2,000 service connections, or an electrical, gas, or telephone corporation, to utilize the services of an independent auditor, who shall be selected and
 supervised by that water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation. Nothing in this section prohibits the commission from auditing any transaction between a water corporation with more than 2,000 service connections, or an electrical, gas, or telephone corporation, and any subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, that water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation, as otherwise permitted or required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 224, Sec. 4.   (SB 1364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

798.

(a) Whenever the commission finds and determines that any water corporation with more than 2,000 service connections, or an electrical, gas, or telephone corporation, has willfully made an imprudent payment to, or received a less than reasonable payment from, any subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, the water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation in violation of any rule or order of the commission, adopted and published by the commission prior to the transaction but after notice to, and an opportunity to comment by, the affected corporation, and the corporation has sought to recover the payment in any proceeding before the commission, the commission, following a hearing, may levy a penalty against the
 corporation not to exceed three times the required or prohibited payment, as the case may be, if the commission finds that the payment, in whole or part, was made or received by the corporation for the purpose of benefiting its subsidiary, affiliate, or holding corporation. This penalty is in addition to any criminal penalties which may apply.

(b) In determining whether to impose a civil penalty under this section, the commission may take into consideration multistate public utility diversification activities involving cross-subsidization which are permissible in other states or under federal jurisdiction although in violation of the commission’s rules and orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 224, Sec. 5.   (SB 1364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

799.

(a) With respect to all taxes enacted by any local jurisdiction, including any city, county, or city and county, including a chartered city or county, any district, including an agency of the state, formed pursuant to general law or special act, for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries, or any public or municipal corporation, and imposed on the customers of public utilities or other service suppliers, which taxes have been collected by the public utilities and other service suppliers and remitted to the local jurisdiction all of the following shall apply:

(1) The public utility or other service supplier shall have no duty to
 independently investigate or inquire with the local jurisdiction concerning the validity of the tax ordinance.

(2) In connection with any actions or claims relating to or arising from the invalidity of the tax ordinance, in whole or in part, the public utility or other service supplier shall not be liable to any customer as a consequence of collecting the tax.

(3) In the event a local jurisdiction is ordered to refund the tax, it shall be the sole responsibility of the local jurisdiction to refund the tax. Unless a public utility or other service supplier is reimbursed by the local jurisdiction for the actual cost of assisting the local jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, calculating or verifying refunds, distributing refunds, providing data, or providing data processing assistance, the public utility or other service supplier shall not be required to assist the local
 jurisdiction to refund the tax, including, but not limited to, calculating or verifying refunds, distributing refunds, providing data, or providing data processing assistance.

(4) In any action seeking to enjoin collection of taxes imposed on customers of utilities or other service suppliers and collected by the utilities or other service suppliers, in any action seeking declaratory relief concerning the taxes, in any action seeking a refund of the taxes, or in any action seeking otherwise to invalidate the taxes, the sole necessary party defendant in the action shall be the local jurisdiction on whose behalf the taxes are collected and the public utility or other service supplier collecting the taxes shall not be named as a party in the action.

(5) If a local jurisdiction repeals the tax, reduces an existing tax rate, changes the tax base, or makes any other changes to the tax
 that would affect the collection and remittance of the tax, the local jurisdiction shall submit, on and after the effective date of the enactment of the change, a written notification and supply all requisite information to the public utility or service supplier, in accordance with the procedures established by the public utility or service supplier. The public utility or other service supplier shall not be required to implement the changes any earlier than 60 days from the date on which the public utility or other service provider receives the written notification and all other information required by the public utility or other service supplier. If the 60th day is not the first day of a month, then the public utility or other service provider shall implement the changes on the first day of the month following the month in which the 60th day occurs.

(6) If a local jurisdiction adopts a new tax, the local jurisdiction shall submit, on and after
 the effective date of the adoption of the new tax, a written notification to the public utility or other service supplier, in accordance with procedures established by the public utility or other service supplier, requesting that the tax be collected. The public utility or other service supplier shall not be required to begin collecting the tax any earlier than 90 days from the date on which the public utility or other service provider receives written notification and all other information required by the public utility or other service supplier. If the 90th day is not the first day of a month, then the public utility or other service provider shall begin the tax collection on the first day of the month following the month in which the 90th day occurs. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the public utility or other service provider from beginning the tax collection at an earlier date.

(b) For purposes of this section, “other
 service supplier” shall include, but not be limited to, a holder of a state franchise issued pursuant to Section 5840.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the limitations imposed by this section constitute an issue of statewide concern. The Legislature further finds and declares that the limitations imposed by this section are not municipal affairs as that term is used in Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the limitations imposed by this section apply to all cities, counties, and cities and counties, including chartered cities and chartered counties, any district, including an agency of the state, formed pursuant to general law or special act, for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries, and any public or municipal corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (SB 1422)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Stocks and Security Transactions [816. - 830.]

816.

The power of public utilities to issue stocks and stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership and bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness and to create liens on their property situated within this State is a special privilege, the right of supervision, regulation, restriction, and control of which is vested in the State, and such power shall be exercised as provided by law under such rules as the commission prescribes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

816.5.

Nothing in this article or in Article 6 (commencing with Section 851) requires a common carrier by railroad subject to the Interstate Commerce Act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) or passenger stage corporation to secure from the commission authority to execute any conditional sales contract for the purchase of motor vehicle or railroad equipment or any note or chattel mortgage on that equipment securing the payment of all, or any part, of the purchase price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 22.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

817.

A public utility may issue stocks and stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership, and bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness payable at periods of more than 12 months after the date thereof, for any one or more of the following purposes and no others:

(a) For the acquisition of property.

(b) For the construction, completion, extension, or improvement of its facilities.

(c) For the improvement or maintenance of its service.

(d) For the discharge or lawful refunding of its obligations.

(e) For the financing of the acquisition and installation of electrical and plumbing appliances and agricultural equipment which are sold by other than a public utility, for use within the service area of the public utility.

(f) For the reorganization or readjustment of its indebtedness or capitalization upon a merger, consolidation, or other reorganization.

(g) For the retirement of or in exchange for one or more outstanding stocks or stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership of such public utility, or bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness of such public utility, with or without the payment of cash.

(h) For the reimbursement of moneys actually expended from income or from any other money in the treasury of the public utility not secured by or obtained from the issue of stocks or stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the public utility, for any of the aforesaid purposes except maintenance of service and replacements, in cases where the applicant has kept its accounts and vouchers for such expenditures in such manner as to enable the commission to ascertain the amount of money so expended and the purposes for which such expenditure was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1370.)
-------------------------------------------

818.

No public utility may issue stocks and stock certificates, or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness payable at periods of more than 12 months after the date thereof unless, in addition to the other requirements of law it shall first have secured from the commission an order authorizing the issue, stating the amount thereof and the purposes to which the issue or the proceeds thereof are to be applied, and that, in the opinion of the commission, the money, property, or labor to be procured or paid for by the issue is reasonably required for the purposes specified in the order, and that, except as otherwise permitted in the order in the case of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, such purposes are not, in whole or in part, reasonably chargeable to operating expenses or to income.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

819.

To enable it to determine whether it will issue the order, the commission may hold a hearing and may make such additional inquiry or investigation, examine such witnesses, books, papers, documents, and contracts, and require the filing of such data as it deems of assistance. The commission may by its order grant permission for the issue of such stocks or stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness in the amount applied for, or in a lesser amount, or refuse such permission, or grant it subject to such conditions as it deems reasonable and necessary. The commission may authorize issues of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, less than, equivalent to or greater than the authorized or subscribed capital stock of a public utility corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

820.

The commission shall have no power to authorize the capitalization of the right to be a corporation, or the capitalization of any franchise or permit, or the right to own, operate, or enjoy any such franchise or permit, in excess of the amount (exclusive of any tax or annual charge) actually paid to the State or to a political subdivision thereof as the consideration for the grant of such franchise, permit, or right. No contract for consolidation or lease shall be capitalized, nor shall any public utility issue any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness against or as a lien upon any contract for consolidation or merger.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

Subject to the provisions of this article, any public utility may issue bonds, or other interest bearing securities maturing at periods of more than 12 months after the date thereof, and may issue one or more classes of preferred stock which may have attached thereto warrants entitling the holder to subscribe for shares of common stock in such amounts, at such future dates, at such prices and on such terms and conditions as may be specified in the warrants. Such bonds, or other interest bearing obligations and such preferred stock also may be issued with provision therein that they may be converted into shares of common stock in such amounts, at such future dates, at such prices, and on such terms and conditions as may be specified therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

Pursuant to this part the commission may, upon an application for an order to issue stocks, bonds, debentures, notes, or other securities or to deliver other consideration in exchange for one or more bona fide outstanding stocks, bonds, debentures, notes, or other securities, claims or property interests, or partly in such exchange and partly for cash, approve the terms and conditions of such issuance and exchange or such delivery and exchange and the fairness of such terms and conditions, after a hearing upon the fairness thereof. All persons to whom it is proposed to issue stocks, bonds, debentures, notes or other securities or to deliver such other consideration in such exchange may appear at such hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

(a) No public utility shall, without the consent of the commission, apply any part of the issue of any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, or any proceeds thereof, to any purpose not specified in the commission’s order, or to any purpose specified in the order in excess of the amount authorized for such purpose, or issue or dispose thereof on any terms less favorable than those specified in the order, or a modification thereof.

(b) A public utility may issue notes, for proper purposes and not in violation of any provision of law, payable at periods of not more than 12 months after the date of issuance of the notes without the consent of the commission.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), no public utility as defined in Section 201(e) of the Federal Power Act (49 Stat. 847, 16 U.S.C. 824) shall, without the consent of the commission, issue notes payable at periods of not more than 12 months after the date of issuance of the notes if such notes and all other notes payable at periods of not more than 12 months after the date of issuance of such notes on which such public utility is primarily or secondarily liable would exceed in aggregate amount 5 percent of the par value of the other securities then outstanding. In the case of securities having no par value, the par value for the purposes of this subsection shall be the fair market value as of the date of issue.

(d) No note payable at a period of not more than 12 months after the date of issuance of such note shall, in whole or in part, be refunded by any issue of stocks or stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership, or of bonds, notes of any term or character, or any other evidence of indebtedness, without the consent of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

824.

The commission may require public utilities to account for the disposition of the proceeds of all sales of stocks and stock certificates or other evidence of interest or ownership, and bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness, in such form and detail as it deems advisable, and may establish such rules as it deems reasonable and necessary to insure the disposition of such proceeds for the purposes specified in its order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

825.

All stock and every stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, and every bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, of a public utility, issued without an order of the commission authorizing the issue thereof then in effect or not conforming in its provisions to any of the provisions which it is required by the order of authorization to contain, is void. No failure in any other respect to comply with the terms or conditions of the order of authorization of the commission shall render void any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, except as to a corporation or person taking it otherwise than in good faith and for value and without actual notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

Every public utility which, directly or indirectly issues or causes to be issued, any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, in nonconformity with the order of the commission authorizing the issue, or contrary to the provisions of this part, or of the Constitution of this State, or which applies any part of the proceeds from the sale thereof, to any purpose other than the purpose or purposes specified in the commission’s order or in an amount in excess of the amount authorized for a specified purpose in the order, is subject to a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

Every officer, agent, or employee of a public utility, and every other person is guilty of a felony who does any of the following acts:

(a) Knowingly authorizes, directs, aids in, issues, or executes, or causes to be issued or executed, any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, in nonconformity with the order of the commission authorizing the issue, or contrary to the provisions of this part or of the Constitution of this State.

(b) Knowingly makes any false statement or representation in any proceeding before the commission or with knowledge of its falsity files or causes to be filed with the commission any false statement or representation which tends in any way to influence the commission to make an order authorizing the issue of any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or any bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, or which results in procuring from the commission the making of any such order.

(c) With knowledge that any false statement or representation was made to the commission, in any proceeding, tending in any way to influence the commission to make such order, issues or executes or negotiates, or causes to be issued, executed, or negotiated any such stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness.

(d) Directly or indirectly, knowingly applies, or causes or assists to be applied any part of the proceeds from the sale of any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, to any purpose not specified in the commission’s order, or to any purpose specified in the commission’s order in excess of the amount authorized for such purpose.

(e) With knowledge that any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, has been issued or executed in violation of any of the provisions of this part, negotiates, or causes the same to be negotiated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

No provision of this part, and no act done or performed under or in connection therewith, shall obligate the State to pay or guarantee, in any manner whatsoever, any stock or stock certificate or other evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, authorized, issued, or executed under the provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

829.

(a) This article shall not apply to any person or corporation which transacts no business subject to regulation under this part, except performing services or delivering commodities for or to public utilities or municipal or other public corporations primarily for resale or use in serving the public or any portion thereof. This article shall apply to any public utility if the commission finds, in a proceeding to which the public utility is or may become a party, that the application of this article is required by the public interest.

(b) (1) Except for Section 828, a telephone corporation that is not regulated under a rate-of-return regulatory structure is exempt from this article. This subdivision does not exempt a telephone corporation that is also an electrical corporation or a gas corporation, unless the commission determines the telephone corporation is exempt pursuant to subdivision (c). As used in this subdivision, a “rate-of-return regulatory structure” means a system under which the rates and charges of the telephone corporation are limited by a maximum permissible price that may be charged for a specific service. Telephone corporations regulated by a framework under which they may exercise pricing flexibility for all or most of the services offered are not regulated under a rate-of-return regulatory structure.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the commission may impose any requirement of this article on a telephone corporation if the commission finds, in a proceeding in which the telephone corporation is or may become a party, that the application of any provision of this article is required by the public interest.

(c) The commission may from time to time by order or rule, and subject to such terms and conditions as may be prescribed therein, exempt any public utility or class of public utility from this article if it finds that the application thereof to such public utility or class of public utility is not necessary in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

830.

No public utility shall assume any obligation or liability as guarantor, endorser, surety, or otherwise in respect of the securities of any other person, firm, or corporation, when such securities are payable at periods of more than 12 months after the date thereof, without having first secured from the commission an order authorizing it so to do. Every such assumption made other than in accordance with the order of the commission authorizing it is void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Financing of Transition Costs [840. - 847.]

840.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bank” means the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank.

(b) “Financing entity” means the bank, any special purpose trust, as defined in Section 63010 of the Government Code, that is authorized by the bank to issue rate reduction bonds or acquire transition property, or any other entity authorized by the bank to issue rate reduction bonds or acquire transition property, or both. The bank may authorize an entity other than a special purpose trust, as defined in Section 63010 of the Government Code, to issue rate reduction bonds only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The bank by resolution has determined that allowing another entity to issue rate reduction bonds would produce greater overall ratepayer savings, taking into account all relevant considerations including, but not limited to, the exclusion of interest on rate reduction bonds issued by the bank from investors’ gross income for California or federal income tax purposes, or both, earnings on funds collected and held by the electrical corporation prior to deposit in a fund or account for the benefit of holders of rate reduction bonds, and all costs of issuance and other transaction costs.

(2) The bank submits to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a certified copy of the bank’s resolution, together with a report setting forth the basis for the bank’s determination that a financing entity other than the bank or a special purpose trust will produce greater ratepayer savings and at least 30 days have elapsed from the date of submission.

(c) “Financing order” shall mean an order of the commission adopted in accordance with this article, which shall include, without limitation, a procedure to require the expeditious approval by the commission of periodic adjustments to fixed transition amounts included therein to ensure recovery of all transition costs and the costs of capital associated with the proposed provision, recovery, financing, or refinancing thereof, including the costs of issuing, servicing, and retiring the rate reduction bonds contemplated by the financing order. These adjustments shall not impose fixed transition amounts upon classes of customers who were not subject to the fixed transition amounts in the pertinent financing order.

(d) “Fixed transition amounts” means those nonbypassable rates and other charges, including, but not limited to, distribution, connection, disconnection, and termination rates and charges, that are authorized by the commission in a financing order to recover (1) transition costs, and (2) the costs of providing, recovering, financing, or refinancing the transition costs through a plan approved by the commission in the financing order, including the costs of issuing, servicing, and retiring rate reduction bonds. If requested by the electrical corporation in its application for a financing order, fixed transition amounts shall include nonbypassable rates and other charges to recover federal and state taxes whose recovery period is modified by the transactions approved in the financing order.

(e) “Rate reduction bonds” means bonds, notes, certificates of participation or beneficial interest, or other evidences of indebtedness or ownership, issued pursuant to an executed indenture or other agreement of a financing entity, the proceeds of which are used, directly or indirectly, to provide, recover, finance, or refinance transition costs, and that are directly or indirectly secured by, or payable from, transition property.

(f) “Transition costs” means the costs, and categories of costs, of an electrical corporation for generation-related assets and obligations, consisting of generation facilities, generation-related regulatory assets, nuclear settlements, and power purchase contracts, including, but not limited to, voluntary restructuring, renegotiations, or terminations thereof approved by the commission, that were being collected in commission-approved rates on December 20, 1995, and that may become uneconomic as a result of a competitive generation market in that those costs may not be recoverable in market prices in a competitive market, and appropriate costs incurred after December 20, 1995, for capital additions to generating facilities existing as of December 20, 1995, that the commission determines are reasonable and should be recovered, provided that these costs are necessary to maintain the facilities through December 31, 2001. Transition costs shall also include the costs of refinancing or retiring of debt or equity capital of the electrical corporation, and associated federal and state tax liabilities.

(g) (1) “Transition property” means the property right created pursuant to this article including, without limitation, the right, title, and interest of an electrical corporation or its transferee:

(A) In and to the tariff established pursuant to a financing order, as adjusted from time to time in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 841 and the financing order.
